Nebraska, session 109, LB642.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Artificial Intelligence Consumer
Protection Act:
(1)(a) Algorithmic discrimination means any use of an artificial
intelligence system that violates state or federal anti-discrimination
laws, including federal statutes prohibiting discrimination on the basis
of citizenship status, color, disability, national origin, race, or sex,
or any other classification protected under the laws of this state or
federal law; and
(b) Algorithmic discrimination does not include:
(i) The offer, license, or use of a high-risk artificial
intelligence system by a developer or deployer for the sole purpose of:
(A) The developer's or deployer's self-testing to identify,
mitigate, or prevent discrimination or otherwise ensure compliance with
state and federal law; or
(B) Expanding an applicant, customer, or participant pool to
increase diversity or redress historical discrimination; or
(ii) An act or omission by or on behalf of a private club or other
establishment that is not in fact open to the public, pursuant to the
federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. 2000a(e), as such section
existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) Artificial intelligence system means any machine-based system
that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the inputs the
system receives how to generate outputs, including content, decisions,
predictions, or recommendations, that can influence physical or virtual
environments;
(3) Consequential decision means a decision that has a material
legal or similarly significant effect on the provision or denial to any
consumer of any, or the cost or terms of any:
(a) Education enrollment or an education opportunity;
-2-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(b) Employment;
(c) Lending decision;
(d) Essential government service;
(e) Health care services;
(f) Housing;
(g) Insurance;
(h) Legal service; or
(i) Pardon, parole, probation, or release decision;
(4) Consumer means any individual who is a resident of this state;
(5) Deploy means to use a high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(6) Deployer means a person doing business in this state that
deploys a high-risk artificial intelligence system in this state;
(7) Developer means a person doing business in this state that
develops or intentionally and substantially modifies a high-risk
artificial intelligence system in this state;
(8) Health care services has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. 234(d)
(2), as such section existed on January 1, 2025;
(9)(a) High-risk artificial intelligence system means any artificial
intelligence system that, when deployed, makes a consequential decision
without human review or intervention; and
(b) High-risk artificial intelligence system does not include:
(i) Any artificial intelligence system if the artificial
intelligence system is intended to:
(A) Perform a narrow procedural task;
(B) Improve the result of a previously completed human activity;
(C) Perform a preparatory task to an assessment that is relevant to
a consequential decision; or
(D) Detect decisionmaking patterns or deviations from preexisting
decisionmaking patterns and is not intended to replace or influence a
previously completed human assessment without sufficient human review;
and
-3-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(ii) Any of the following technology:
(A) Antifraud technology;
(B) Antimalware;
(C) Antivirus;
(D) Artificial intelligence-enabled video game;
(E) Calculator;
(F) Cybersecurity;
(G) Database;
(H) Data storage;
(I) Firewall;
(J) Internet domain registration;
(K) Internet website loading;
(L) Networking;
(M) Spam-filtering;
(N) Robocall-filtering;
(O) Spell-checking;
(P) Spreadsheet;
(Q) Web caching;
(R) Web hosting or any similar technology; or
(S) Technology that:
(I) Communicates with any consumer in natural language for the
purpose of providing such consumer with information, making any referral
or recommendation, or answering any question; and
(II) Is subject to an acceptable use policy that prohibits
generating content that is unlawful or harmful;
(10) Insurer means any person engaged as principal, indemnitor,
surety, or contractor in the business of making contracts of insurance;
(11)(a) Intentional and substantial modification means a deliberate
and material change made to an artificial intelligence system that
materially increases the known risk of algorithmic discrimination; and
(b) Intentional and substantial modification does not include any
-4-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
change made to any high-risk artificial intelligence system, or the
performance of any high-risk artificial intelligence system, if:
(i) The high-risk artificial intelligence system continues to learn
after the high-risk artificial intelligence system is:
(A) Offered, sold, leased, licensed, given, or otherwise made
available to a deployer; or
(B) Deployed;
(ii) The change is made to the high-risk artificial intelligence
system as a result of any learning described in subdivision (10)(b)(i) of
this section;
(iii) The change was predetermined by the deployer, or a third party
contracted by the deployer, when the deployer or third party completed an
initial impact assessment of such high-risk artificial intelligence
system pursuant to subsection (3) of section 4 of this act; and
(iv) The change is included in technical documentation for the high-
risk artificial intelligence system;
(12) Intentionally and substantially modifies means intentional and
substantial modification as defined in this section;
(13) Principal basis means the use of an output of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system to make a decision without:
(a) Human review, oversight, involvement, or intervention; or
(b) Meaningful consideration by a human;
(14) Red teaming means an exercise that is conducted to identify the
potential adverse behaviors or outcomes of an artificial intelligence
system, identify how such behaviors or outcomes occur, and stress test
the safeguards against such behaviors or outcomes;
(15)(a) Substantial factor means any factor that:
(i) Is the principal basis for making a consequential decision;
(ii) Is capable of altering the outcome of a consequential decision;
and
(iii) Is generated by an artificial intelligence system; and
-5-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(b) Substantial factor includes any use of any artificial
intelligence system to generate any content, decision, prediction, or
recommendation concerning any consumer that is used as a basis to make a
consequential decision concerning the consumer; and
(16) Trade secret has the same meaning as in section 87-502.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, a developer of a
high-risk artificial intelligence system shall use reasonable care to
protect consumers from any known risks of algorithmic discrimination
arising from the intended and contracted uses of the high-risk artificial
intelligence system.
(b) In any enforcement action brought on or after February 1, 2026,
by the Attorney General pursuant to section 7 of this act, there is a
rebuttable presumption that a developer used reasonable care as required
under this section if the developer complied with this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section,
on and after February 1, 2026, each developer of a high-risk artificial
intelligence system shall make available to the deployer or other
developer of the high-risk artificial intelligence system:
(a) A general statement describing the uses and known harmful or
inappropriate uses of the high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(b) Documentation disclosing:
(i) A high-level summary of the types of data used to train the
high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(ii) Each known limitation of the high-risk artificial intelligence
system, including each known or reasonably foreseeable risk of
algorithmic discrimination arising from the intended use of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system;
(iii) The purpose of the high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(iv) Any intended benefit and use of the high-risk artificial
intelligence system; and
(v) Information necessary to allow the deployer to comply with the
-6-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
requirements of section 4 of this act;
(c) Documentation describing:
(i) How the high-risk artificial intelligence system was evaluated
for performance and mitigation of algorithmic discrimination before the
high-risk artificial intelligence system was offered, sold, leased,
licensed, given, or otherwise made available to the deployer;
(ii) The data governance measures used to cover the training
datasets and the measures used to examine the suitability of data
sources, possible biases, and appropriate mitigation;
(iii) Intended outputs of the high-risk artificial intelligence
system;
(iv) The measures the developer has taken to mitigate known risks of
algorithmic discrimination that could arise from the deployment of the
high-risk artificial intelligence system; and
(v) How the high-risk artificial intelligence system should be used,
not be used, and be monitored by an individual when the high-risk
artificial intelligence system is used to make, or is a substantial
factor in making, a consequential decision; and
(d) Documentation that is reasonably necessary to assist the
deployer in understanding each output and monitor the performance of the
high-risk artificial intelligence system for each risk of algorithmic
discrimination.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this
section, on or after February 1, 2026, a developer that offers, sells,
leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise makes any high-risk artificial
intelligence system available to a deployer or other developer shall to
the extent feasible make available to the deployer or other developer the
documentation and information necessary for the deployer or a third party
contracted by the deployer to complete an impact assessment pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 4 of this act. Such documentation and
information includes any model card or other impact assessment.
-7-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(b) A developer that also serves as a deployer for a high-risk
artificial intelligence system is not required to generate the
documentation required by this section unless the high-risk artificial
intelligence system is provided to an unaffiliated entity acting as a
deployer.
(4)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, a developer shall make a
statement summarizing the following available in a manner that is clear
and readily available in a public use case inventory:
(i) The types of high-risk artificial intelligence systems that the
developer has developed and currently makes available to a deployer or
other developer;
(ii) The types of high-risk artificial intelligence system that the
developer has intentionally and substantially modified and currently
makes available to a deployer or other developer; and
(iii) How the developer manages known risks of algorithmic
discrimination that could arise from the development or intentional and
substantial modification of the types of high-risk artificial
intelligence systems described in subdivisions (4)(a)(i) and (ii) of this
section.
(b) A developer shall update the statement described in subdivision
(4)(a) of this section:
(i) As necessary to ensure that the statement remains accurate; and
(ii) No later than ninety days after the developer intentionally and
substantially modifies any high-risk artificial intelligence system
described in subdivision (4)(a)(ii) of this section.
(5)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, a developer of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system shall disclose to all known deployers or
other developers of the high-risk artificial intelligence system, each
known risk of algorithmic discrimination arising from any intended use of
the high-risk artificial intelligence system without unreasonable delay
after the date on which:
-8-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(i) The developer discovers through the developer's ongoing testing
and analysis that the developer's high-risk artificial intelligence
system has been deployed and has caused or is reasonably likely to have
caused algorithmic discrimination; or
(ii) The developer receives from a deployer a credible report that
the high-risk artificial intelligence system has been deployed and has
caused algorithmic discrimination.
(b) The Attorney General shall prescribe the form and manner of the
disclosure described in subdivision (a) of this subsection.
(6) Nothing in subsections (2) through (5) of this section requires
a developer to disclose any:
(a) Trade secret;
(b) Information protected from disclosure by state or federal law;
or
(c) Information that would create a security risk to the developer.
(7)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, the Attorney General may
provide a written demand to any developer to disclose to the Attorney
General the statement or documentation described in subsection (2) of
this section if such a statement or documentation is relevant to an
investigation related to the developer conducted by the Attorney General.
Such statement or documentation shall be provided to the Attorney General
in a form and manner prescribed by the Attorney General.
(b) The Attorney General may evaluate such statement or
documentation, if it is relevant to an investigation conducted by the
Attorney General regarding a violation of the Artificial Intelligence
Consumer Protection Act, to ensure compliance with the Artificial
Intelligence Consumer Protection Act.
(c) In any disclosure pursuant to this subsection, any developer may
designate the statement or documentation as including proprietary
information or a trade secret.
(d) To the extent any such statement or documentation includes any
-9-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
proprietary information or any trade secret, such statement or
documentation shall be exempt from disclosure.
(8) If a developer completes documentation for the purpose of
complying with another applicable law or regulation, such documentation
shall be deemed to satisfy this section if such documentation is
reasonably similar in scope and effect to the documentation that would
otherwise be completed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 4. (1)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, a deployer of any
high-risk artificial intelligence system shall use reasonable care to
protect consumers from each known risk of algorithmic discrimination.
(b) In any enforcement action brought on or after February 1, 2026,
by the Attorney General pursuant to section 7 of this act, there is a
rebuttable presumption that a deployer of a high-risk artificial
intelligence system used reasonable care as required under this section
if the deployer complied with this section.
(2)(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this
section, on and after February 1, 2026, a deployer of a high-risk
artificial intelligence system shall implement a risk management policy
and program to govern the deployer's deployment of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system. High-risk artificial intelligence systems
that are in conformity with the guidance and standards set forth in the
following as of January 1, 2025, shall be presumed to be in conformity
with this section:
(i) The Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Framework published
by the National Institute of Standards and Technology; or
(ii) The standard ISO/IEC 42001 of the International Organization
for Standardization.
(b) Any risk management policy and program implemented pursuant to
subdivision (a) of this subsection may cover multiple high-risk
artificial intelligence systems deployed by the deployer.
(3)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection or subsection
-10-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(6) of this section:
(i) An impact assessment shall be completed for each high-risk
artificial intelligence system deployed on or after February 1, 2026.
Such impact assessment shall be completed by the deployer or by a third
party contracted by the deployer; and
(ii) On and after February 1, 2026, for each deployed high-risk
artificial intelligence system, a deployer or a third party contracted by
the deployer shall complete an impact assessment within ninety days after
any intentional and substantial modification to such high-risk artificial
intelligence system is made available.
(b) An impact assessment completed pursuant to this subsection shall
include to the extent reasonably known by or available to the deployer:
(i) A statement by the deployer disclosing:
(A) The purpose of the high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(B) Any intended-use case for the high-risk artificial intelligence
system;
(C) The deployment context of the high-risk artificial intelligence
system; and
(D) Any benefit afforded by the high-risk artificial intelligence
system;
(ii) An analysis of whether the deployment of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system poses any known risk of algorithmic
discrimination and, if so, the nature of the algorithmic discrimination
and the steps that have been taken to mitigate any such risk;
(iii) A high-level summary of the categories of data the high-risk
artificial intelligence system processes as inputs and the outputs the
high-risk artificial intelligence system produces;
(iv) If the deployer used data to customize the high-risk artificial
intelligence system, an overview of the categories of data the deployer
used to customize the high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(v) Any metric used to evaluate the performance and any known
-11-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
limitation of the high-risk artificial intelligence system;
(vi) A description of any transparency measure taken concerning the
high-risk artificial intelligence system, including any measure taken to
disclose to a consumer when the high-risk artificial intelligence system
is in use; and
(vii) A description of each postdeployment monitoring and user
safeguard provided concerning the high-risk artificial intelligence
system, including the oversight, use, and learning process established by
the deployer to address any issue that arises from the deployment of the
high-risk artificial intelligence system.
(c) Any impact assessment completed pursuant to this subsection
following an intentional and substantial modification to a high-risk
artificial intelligence system on or after February 1, 2026, shall
include a statement that discloses the extent to which the high-risk
artificial intelligence system was used in a manner that was consistent
with or varied from any use of the high-risk artificial intelligence
system intended by the developer.
(d) A single impact assessment may address a comparable set of high-
risk artificial intelligence systems deployed by a deployer.
(e) Any impact assessment completed to comply with another
applicable law or regulation by a deployer or by a third party contracted
by the deployer shall satisfy this subsection if such impact assessment
is reasonably similar in scope and effect to the impact assessment that
would otherwise be completed pursuant to this subsection.
(f) A deployer shall maintain:
(i) The most recently completed impact assessment required under
this subsection for each high-risk artificial intelligence system of the
deployer;
(ii) Each record concerning each such impact assessment; and
(iii) For at least three years following the final deployment of
each high-risk artificial intelligence system, each prior impact
-12-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
assessment, if any, and each record concerning such impact assessment.
(4)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, prior to deploying any high-
risk artificial intelligence system to make or be a substantial factor in
making any consequential decision concerning any consumer, the deployer
shall:
(i) Notify the consumer that the deployer has deployed a high-risk
artificial intelligence system to make or be a substantial factor in
making a consequential decision;
(ii) Provide to the consumer:
(A) A statement that discloses the purpose of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system and the nature of the consequential
decision;
(B) The contact information for the deployer;
(C) A description written in plain language that describes the high-
risk artificial intelligence system; and
(D) Instructions on how to access the statement described in
subdivision (5)(a) of this section; and
(iii) If applicable, provide information to the consumer regarding
the consumer's right to opt out of the processing of personal data
concerning the consumer for any purpose of profiling in furtherance of
decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning
the consumer under subdivision (2)(e)(iii) of section 87-1107.
(b) On and after February 1, 2026, for each high-risk artificial
intelligence system that makes or is a substantial factor in making any
consequential decision that is adverse to any consumer, the deployer of
such high-risk artificial intelligence system shall provide to such
consumer:
(i) A statement that discloses each principal reason for the
consequential decision, including:
(A) The degree to and manner in which the high-risk artificial
intelligence system contributed to the consequential decision;
-13-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(B) The type of data that was processed by the high-risk artificial
intelligence system in making the consequential decision; and
(C) Each source of the data described in subdivision (b)(i)(B) of
this subsection;
(ii) An opportunity to correct any incorrect personal data that the
high-risk artificial intelligence system processed in making or processed
as a substantial factor in making the consequential decision; and
(iii) An opportunity to appeal any adverse consequential decision
concerning the consumer arising from the deployment of the high-risk
artificial intelligence system unless providing the opportunity for
appeal is not in the best interest of the consumer, including instances
when any delay might pose a risk to the life or safety of such consumer.
Any such appeal shall allow for human review if technically feasible.
(c)(i) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(ii) of this subsection,
a deployer shall provide the notice, statement, contact information, and
description required under subdivisions (4)(a) and (b) of this section:
(A) Directly to the consumer;
(B) In plain language;
(C) In each language in which the deployer in the ordinary course of
business provides any contract, disclaimer, sale announcement, or other
information to any consumer; and
(D) In a format that is accessible to any consumer with any
disability.
(ii) If the deployer is unable to provide the notice, statement,
contact information, and description required under subdivisions (a) and
(b) of this subsection directly to the consumer, the deployer shall make
the notice, statement, contact information, and description available in
a manner that is reasonably calculated to ensure that the consumer
receives the notice, statement, contact information, and description.
(5)(a) Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, on and
after February 1, 2026, a deployer shall make a statement with the
-14-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
following information available in a manner that is clear and readily
available:
(i) The types of high-risk artificial intelligence systems that are
currently deployed by the deployer;
(ii) How the deployer manages known risks of algorithmic
discrimination that may arise from the deployment of the types of high-
risk artificial intelligence systems described in subdivision (a)(ii) of
this subsection; and
(iii) A description of the nature, source, and extent of the
information collected and used by the deployer.
(b) A deployer shall update the statement described in subdivision
(a) of this subsection at least once each year.
(6) Subsections (2), (3), and (5) of this section do not apply to a
deployer if when deploying a high-risk artificial intelligence system and
at all times while the high-risk artificial intelligence system is
deployed:
(a) The deployer:
(i) Employs fewer than fifty full-time equivalent employees; and
(ii) Does not use the deployer's own data to train the high-risk
artificial intelligence system;
(b) The high-risk artificial intelligence system:
(i) Is used for any intended use that is disclosed to the deployer
as required under subdivision (2)(a) of section 3 of this act; and
(ii) Continues learning based on data derived from sources other
than the deployer's own data; and
(c) The deployer makes available to consumers any impact assessment
that:
(i) The developer of the high-risk artificial intelligence system
has completed and provided to the deployer; and
(ii) Includes information that is substantially similar to the
information in the impact assessment required under subdivision (3)(b) of
-15-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
this section.
(7) Nothing in this section requires a deployer to disclose a trade
secret or information protected from disclosure by state or federal law.
To the extent that a deployer withholds information pursuant to this
subsection or subsection (5) of section 6 of this act, the deployer shall
notify the consumer and provide a basis for such withholding.
(8)(a) On and after February 1, 2026, in connection with an ongoing
investigation related to the deployer, the Attorney General may require
any deployer or third party contracted by a deployer to disclose any of
the following to the Attorney General no later than ninety days after
such request in a form and manner prescribed by the Attorney General:
(i) The risk management policy implemented pursuant to subsection
(2) of this section;
(ii) The impact assessment completed pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section; or
(iii) The records maintained pursuant to subdivision (3)(f) of this
section.
(b) If such risk management policy, impact assessment, or record is
relevant to an investigation conducted by the Attorney General regarding
a violation of the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act, the
Attorney General may evaluate the risk management policy, impact
assessment, or records disclosed pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection to ensure compliance with the Artificial Intelligence Consumer
Protection Act.
(c) Any disclosure under this subsection shall not be a public
record subject to disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(d) A deployer may designate any statement or documentation
disclosed under this subsection as including proprietary information or a
trade secret.
(9) If a deployer completes documentation for the purpose of
complying with another applicable law or regulation, such documentation
-16-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
shall be deemed to satisfy this section if such documentation is
reasonably similar in scope and effect to the documentation that would
otherwise be completed pursuant to this section.
Sec. 5. (1) On and after February 1, 2026, and except as otherwise
provided in subsection (2) of this section, a deployer or other developer
that deploys, offers, sells, leases, licenses, gives, or otherwise makes
available any artificial intelligence system that is intended to interact
with any consumer shall include in the disclosure to each consumer who
interacts with such artificial intelligence system that the consumer is
interacting with an artificial intelligence system.
(2) Disclosure is not required under subsection (1) of this section
under any circumstance when it would be obvious to a reasonable person
that the person is interacting with an artificial intelligence system.
Sec. 6. (1) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act
does not restrict the ability of any developer, deployer, or other person
to:
(a) Comply with federal, state, or municipal laws, ordinances, or
regulations;
(b) Comply with any civil, criminal, or regulatory inquiry,
investigation, subpoena, or summons by any federal, state, municipal, or
other governmental authority;
(c) Cooperate with any law enforcement agency concerning conduct or
activity that the developer, deployer, or other person reasonably and in
good faith believes may violate any federal, state, or municipal law,
ordinance, or regulation;
(d) Investigate, establish, exercise, prepare for, or defend any
legal claim;
(e) Take immediate action to protect any interest that is essential
for the life or physical safety of any consumer or another individual;
(f) By any means:
(i) Prevent, detect, protect against, or respond to any security
-17-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
incident, identity theft, fraud, harassment, malicious or deceptive
activity, or illegal activity;
(ii) Investigate, report, or prosecute any person responsible for
any action described in subdivision (f)(i) of this subsection; or
(iii) Preserve the integrity or security of any system of the
developer, deployer, or other person;
(g) Engage in public or peer-reviewed scientific or statistical
research in the public interest that:
(i) Adheres to each applicable ethics or privacy law; and
(ii) Is conducted in accordance with 45 C.F.R. part 46, as such
section existed on January 1, 2025, or any relevant requirement
established by the federal Food and Drug Administration;
(h) Conduct any research, testing, or development activity regarding
any artificial intelligence system or model, other than testing conducted
under real-world conditions, before the artificial intelligence system or
model is placed on the market, deployed, or put into service; or
(i) Provide assistance complying with the Artificial Intelligence
Consumer Protection Act to any other developer, deployer, or person.
(2) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
restrict the ability of any developer, deployer, or other person to:
(a) Effectuate a product recall; or
(b) Identify and repair any technical error that impairs existing or
intended functionality of any artificial intelligence system.
(3) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
apply to any instance in which compliance with such act would violate any
evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state.
(4) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not and
shall not be construed to impose any obligation on any developer,
deployer, or other person that adversely affects any right or freedom of
any person, including the rights of a person to freedom of speech or
freedom of the press.
-18-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(5) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
apply to any developer, deployer, or other person:
(a) If the developer, deployer, or other person develops, deploys,
puts into service, or intentionally and substantially modifies any high-
risk artificial intelligence system:
(i) That has been approved, authorized, certified, cleared,
developed, deployed, or granted by any federal agency acting within the
scope of authority of such federal agency; or
(ii) In compliance with standards established by any federal agency,
if the standards are substantially equivalent or more stringent than the
requirements of the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act;
(b) Conducting research to support an application:
(i) For approval or certification from any federal agency, federal
administration, or federal commission; or
(ii) That is subject to review by any federal agency, federal
administration, or federal commission;
(c) Performing work under or in connection with any contract with
the United States Department of Commerce, the United States Department of
Defense, or the National Aeronautics and Space Administration, unless
such work relates to any high-risk artificial intelligence system that is
used to make or is a substantial factor in making a decision concerning
employment or housing; or
(d) That is providing or facilitating any health care recommendation
that:
(i) Is generated by any artificial intelligence system; and
(ii) Includes a health care provider in the process to implement the
recommendation.
(6) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
apply to any artificial intelligence system that is acquired by or for
the federal government or any federal agency or department, unless the
artificial intelligence system is a high-risk artificial intelligence
-19-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
system that is used to make or is a substantial factor in making a
decision concerning employment or housing.
(7) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
apply to any of the following that are subject to the Unfair Insurance
Trade Practices Act:
(a) Any insurer;
(b) Any fraternal benefit society as described in section 44-1072;
and
(c) Any developer of an artificial intelligence system used by an
insurer.
(8)(a) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Affiliate has the same meaning as in section 8-916;
(ii) Bank has the same meaning as in section 8-909; and
(iii) Credit union has the same meaning as in section 21-1705.
(b) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
apply to any bank, credit union, affiliate or subsidiary of any bank or
credit union, or service provider that is subject to examination by any
state or federal prudential regulator under any published guidance or
regulations that apply to the use of high-risk artificial intelligence
systems and the guidance or regulations:
(i) Impose requirements that are substantially equivalent to or more
stringent than the requirements imposed in the Artificial Intelligence
Consumer Protection Act as determined by the Attorney General; and
(ii) At a minimum, require the bank, credit union, affiliate or
subsidiary of the bank or credit union, or service provider to:
(A) Regularly audit the use of any high-risk artificial intelligence
system by the bank, credit union, or affiliate or subsidiary of the bank
or credit union for compliance with state and federal antidiscrimination
laws and regulations applicable to the bank, credit union, affiliate or
subsidiary of the bank or credit union, or service provider; and
(B) Mitigate any algorithmic discrimination caused by the use of any
-20-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
high-risk artificial intelligence system or any risk of algorithmic
discrimination that is a result of the use of any high-risk artificial
intelligence system.
(9) If any developer, deployer, or other person engages in any
action pursuant to an exemption set forth in this section, the developer,
deployer, or other person bears the burden of demonstrating that the
action qualifies for the exemption.
(10) This section does not apply to:
(a) Artificial intelligence systems, including their output,
specifically developed and put into service for the sole purpose of
scientific research and development;
(b) A regulated entity subject to the supervision and regulation of
the Federal Housing Finance Agency; or
(c) A creditor as defined by and subject to the federal Equal Credit
Opportunity Act, 15 U.S.C. 1691 et seq., or the regulations adopted
pursuant to such act.
Sec. 7. (1) The Attorney General has exclusive authority to enforce
the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, the
Attorney General shall, prior to initiating any action for a violation of
the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act, issue a notice of
violation to the developer, deployer, or other person describing with
specificity the alleged violation and the actions that shall be taken by
the recipient of the notice to cure the violation. If the developer,
deployer, or other person fails to cure such violation not later than
ninety days after receipt of the notice of violation, the Attorney
General may bring an action under the Artificial Intelligence Consumer
Protection Act.
(3) In any action commenced by the Attorney General to enforce the
Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act, it is an affirmative
defense that the developer, deployer, or other person:
-21-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
(a) Discovers and cures a violation of the Artificial Intelligence
Consumer Protection Act as a result of:
(i) Feedback that the developer, deployer, or other person
encourages deployers or users to provide to the developer, deployer, or
other person;
(ii) Adversarial testing or red teaming; or
(iii) An internal review process; and
(b) Is otherwise in compliance with:
(i) The Artificial Intelligence Risk Management Framework published
by the National Institute of Standards and Technology and standard
ISO/IEC 42001 of the International Organization for Standardization, as
such framework and standard existed on January 1, 2025;
(ii) Another nationally or internationally recognized risk
management framework for artificial intelligence systems, if the
standards are substantially equivalent to or more stringent than the
requirements of the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act as
determined by the Attorney General; or
(iii) Any risk management framework for artificial intelligence
systems designated and publicly disseminated by the Attorney General.
(4) Any developer, deployer, or other person bears the burden of
demonstrating to the Attorney General that the requirements of subsection
(3) of this section have been satisfied.
(5)(a) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act shall not
be construed to preempt or otherwise affect any right, claim, remedy,
presumption, or defense available at law or in equity.
(b) Any rebuttable presumption or affirmative defense under the
Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act applies only to an
enforcement action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to this
section and shall not apply to any right, claim, remedy, presumption, or
defense available at law or in equity.
(6) The Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act does not
-22-

LB642 LB642
2025 2025
provide the basis for and is not subject to any private right of action
for any violation of the Artificial Intelligence Consumer Protection Act
or any other law.
Sec. 8. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-23-